Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 8

County Highway Commissions [Repealed]

54-8-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, § 1; Code 1932, § 3278; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 413, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-701; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.

54-8-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, § 2; Code 1932, § 3279; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-702; Acts 1996, ch. 685, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.

54-8-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, §§ 3, 4; mod. Code 1932, § 3280; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-703; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.

54-8-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, § 4(a), as added by Acts 1931, ch. 101, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3280.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-704; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.

54-8-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, § 4(e), as added by Acts 1931, ch. 101, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3280.5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-708l; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.

54-8-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, § 4(f), as added by Acts 1931, ch. 101, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3280.6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-709; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.

54-8-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1929, ch. 54, § 4(g), as added by Acts 1931, ch. 101, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3280.7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-710; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 34, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 8, §§ 54-8-101 — 54-8-107, concerned county highway commissions.